Illinois, session 104th, HB3108.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Ticket Sale and Resale Act is amended by 5changing Section 1.5 and by adding Sections 0.5 and 1.6 as 6follows: 7    (815 ILCS 414/0.5 new)8    Sec. 0.5. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Broker" or "ticket broker" means a person, including a 10ticket issuer, that resells or makes a secondary sale of a 11ticket to the general public.12    "Reseller" or "ticket reseller" means a person engaged in 13the resale of tickets.14    "Seller" or "ticket seller" means a person who has the 15right to sell a ticket prior to or at the primary sale of the 16ticket, including the event organizer or a person that 17provides services to conduct or facilitate the primary sale of 18tickets by or on behalf of the event organizer.19    "Ticket" means a physical, electronic, or other form of a 20certificate, document, voucher, token, or other evidence 21indicating that a person has the right to be admitted to an 22event.23    "Ticket resale marketplace" means a person that operates a   HB3108- 2 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1platform or exchange for the resale of tickets between third 2parties or between the ticket resale marketplace and a third 3party. "Ticket resale marketplace" includes a ticket issuer 4only to the extent the ticket issuer is acting to facilitate 5the resale of tickets between third parties or between the 6ticket issuer, acting as a ticket resale marketplace, and a 7third party. 8    (815 ILCS 414/1.5)  (was 720 ILCS 375/1.5)9    Sec. 1.5. Sale of tickets at more than face value 10prohibited; exceptions. 11    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b), (c), 12(d), (e), and (f-5) of this Section and in Section 4, it is 13unlawful for any person, persons, firm or corporation to sell 14tickets for baseball games, football games, hockey games, 15theatre entertainments, or any other amusement for a price 16more than the price printed upon the face of said ticket, and 17the price of said ticket shall correspond with the same price 18shown at the box office or the office of original 19distribution.20    (b) This Act does not apply to the resale of tickets of 21admission to a sporting event, theater, musical performance, 22or place of public entertainment or amusement of any kind for a 23price in excess of the printed box office ticket price by a 24ticket broker who meets all of the following requirements:25        (1) The ticket broker is duly registered with the   HB3108- 3 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1    Office of the Secretary of State on a registration form 2    provided by that Office. The registration must contain a 3    certification that the ticket broker:4            (A) engages in the resale of tickets on a regular 5        and ongoing basis from one or more permanent or fixed 6        locations located within this State;7            (B) maintains as the principal business activity 8        at those locations the resale of tickets;9            (C) displays at those locations the ticket 10        broker's registration;11            (D) maintains at those locations a listing of the 12        names and addresses of all persons employed by the 13        ticket broker;14            (E) is in compliance with all applicable federal, 15        State, and local laws relating to its ticket selling 16        activities, and that neither the ticket broker nor any 17        of its employees within the preceding 12 months have 18        been convicted of a violation of this Act; and19            (F) meets the following requirements:20                (i) the ticket broker maintains a toll free 21            number specifically dedicated for Illinois 22            consumer complaints and inquiries concerning 23            ticket sales;24                (ii) the ticket broker has adopted a code that 25            advocates consumer protection that includes, at a 26            minimum:  HB3108- 4 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1                    (a-1) consumer protection guidelines;2                    (b-1) a standard refund policy. In the 3                event a refund is due, the ticket broker shall 4                provide that refund without charge other than 5                for reasonable delivery fees for the return of 6                the tickets; and7                    (c-1) standards of professional conduct;8                (iii) the ticket broker has adopted a 9            procedure for the binding resolution of consumer 10            complaints by an independent, disinterested third 11            party and thereby submits to the jurisdiction of 12            the State of Illinois; and13                (iv) the ticket broker has established and 14            maintains a consumer protection rebate fund in 15            Illinois in an amount in excess of $100,000, which 16            must be cash available for immediate disbursement 17            for satisfaction of valid consumer complaints.18        Alternatively, the ticket broker may fulfill the 19    requirements of subparagraph (F) of this paragraph (1) if 20    the ticket broker certifies that he or she belongs to a 21    professional association organized under the laws of this 22    State, or organized under the laws of any other state and 23    authorized to conduct business in Illinois, that has been 24    in existence for at least 3 years prior to the date of that 25    broker's registration with the Office of the Secretary of 26    State, and is specifically dedicated, for and on behalf of   HB3108- 5 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1    its members, to provide and maintain the consumer 2    protection requirements of subparagraph (F) of this 3    paragraph (1) to maintain the integrity of the ticket 4    brokerage industry.5        (2) (Blank).6        (3) The ticket broker and his employees must not 7    engage in the practice of selling, or attempting to sell, 8    tickets for any event while sitting or standing near the 9    facility at which the event is to be held or is being held 10    unless the ticket broker or his or her employees are on 11    property they own, lease, or have permission to occupy.12        (4) The ticket broker must comply with all 13    requirements of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and 14    collect and remit all other applicable federal, State and 15    local taxes in connection with the ticket broker's ticket 16    selling activities.17        (5) Beginning January 1, 1996, no ticket broker shall 18    advertise for resale any tickets within this State unless 19    the advertisement contains the name of the ticket broker 20    and the Illinois registration number issued by the Office 21    of the Secretary of State under this Section.22        (6) Each ticket broker registered under this Act shall 23    pay an annual registration fee of $100.24    (c) This Act does not apply to the sale of tickets of 25admission to a sporting event, theater, musical performance, 26or place of public entertainment or amusement of any kind for a   HB3108- 6 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1price in excess of the printed box office ticket price by a 2reseller engaged in interstate or intrastate commerce on an 3Internet auction listing service duly registered with the 4Office of the Secretary of State on a registration form 5provided by that Office. This subsection (c) applies to both 6sales through an online bid submission process and sales at a 7fixed price on the same website or interactive computer 8service as an Internet auction listing service.9    This subsection (c) applies to resales described in this 10subsection only if the ticket resale marketplace operator of 11the Internet auction listing service meets the following 12requirements:13        (1) the ticket resale marketplace operator maintains a 14    listing of the names and addresses of its corporate 15    officers;16        (2) the ticket resale marketplace operator is in 17    compliance with all applicable federal, State, and local 18    laws relating to ticket selling activities, and the ticket 19    resale marketplace operator's officers and directors have 20    not been convicted of a violation of this Act within the 21    preceding 12 months; 22        (3) the ticket resale marketplace operator maintains, 23    either itself or through an affiliate, a toll free number 24    dedicated for consumer complaints;25        (4) the ticket resale marketplace operator provides 26    consumer protections that include at a minimum:  HB3108- 7 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1            (A) consumer protection guidelines;2            (B) a standard refund policy that guarantees to 3        all purchasers that it will provide and in fact 4        provides a full refund of the amount paid by the 5        purchaser (including, but not limited to, all fees, 6        regardless of how characterized) if the following 7        occurs:8                (i) the ticketed event is cancelled and the 9            purchaser returns the tickets to the seller or 10            Internet auction listing service; however, 11            reasonable delivery fees need not be refunded if 12            the previously disclosed guarantee specifies that 13            the fees will not be refunded if the event is 14            cancelled;15                (ii) the ticket received by the purchaser does 16            not allow the purchaser to enter the ticketed 17            event for reasons that may include, without 18            limitation, that the ticket is counterfeit or that 19            the ticket has been cancelled by the issuer due to 20            non-payment, unless the ticket is cancelled due to 21            an act or omission by such purchaser;22                (iii) the ticket fails to conform to its 23            description on the Internet auction listing 24            service; or25                (iv) the ticket seller willfully fails to send 26            the ticket or tickets to the purchaser, or the   HB3108- 8 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1            ticket seller attempted to deliver the ticket or 2            tickets to the purchaser in the manner required by 3            the Internet auction listing service and the 4            purchaser failed to receive the ticket or tickets; 5            and 6            (C) standards of professional conduct; 7        (5) the ticket resale marketplace operator has adopted 8    an independent and disinterested dispute resolution 9    procedure that allows resellers or purchasers to file 10    complaints against the other and have those complaints 11    mediated or resolved by a third party, and requires the 12    resellers or purchasers to submit to the jurisdiction of 13    the State of Illinois for complaints involving a ticketed 14    event held in Illinois;15        (6) the ticket resale marketplace operator either:16            (A) complies with all applicable requirements of 17        the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and collects and 18        remits all applicable federal, State, and local taxes; 19        or 20            (B) publishes a written notice on the website 21        after the sale of one or more tickets that 22        automatically informs the ticket reseller of the 23        ticket reseller's potential legal obligation to pay 24        any applicable local amusement tax in connection with 25        the reseller's sale of tickets, and discloses to law 26        enforcement or other government tax officials, without   HB3108- 9 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1        subpoena, the name, city, state, telephone number, 2        e-mail address, user ID history, fraud complaints, and 3        bidding and listing history of any specifically 4        identified reseller or purchaser upon the receipt of a 5        verified request from law enforcement or other 6        government tax officials relating to a criminal 7        investigation or alleged illegal activity; and 8        (7) the ticket resale marketplace operator either:9            (A) has established and maintains a consumer 10        protection rebate fund in Illinois in an amount in 11        excess of $100,000, which must be cash available for 12        immediate disbursement for satisfaction of valid 13        consumer complaints; or14            (B) has obtained and maintains in force an errors 15        and omissions insurance policy that provides at least 16        $100,000 in coverage. 17    (d) This Act does not apply to the resale of tickets of 18admission to a sporting event, theater, musical performance, 19or place of public entertainment or amusement of any kind for a 20price in excess of the printed box office ticket price 21conducted at an auction solely by or for a not-for-profit 22organization for charitable purposes under clause (a)(1) of 23Section 10-1 of the Auction License Act.24    (e) This Act does not apply to the resale of a ticket for 25admission to a baseball game, football game, hockey game, 26theatre entertainment, or any other amusement for a price more   HB3108- 10 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1than the price printed on the face of the ticket and for more 2than the price of the ticket at the box office if the resale is 3made through an Internet website whose ticket resale 4marketplace operator meets the following requirements:5        (1) the ticket resale marketplace operator has a 6    business presence and physical street address in the State 7    of Illinois and clearly and conspicuously posts that 8    address on the website;9        (2) the ticket resale marketplace operator maintains a 10    listing of the names of the ticket resale marketplace 11    operator's directors and officers, and is duly registered 12    with the Office of the Secretary of State on a 13    registration form provided by that Office; 14        (3) the ticket resale marketplace operator is in 15    compliance with all applicable federal, State, and local 16    laws relating to its ticket reselling activities regulated 17    under this Act, and the ticket resale marketplace 18    operator's officers and directors have not been convicted 19    of a violation of this Act within the preceding 12 months; 20        (4) the ticket resale marketplace operator maintains a 21    toll free number specifically dedicated for consumer 22    complaints and inquiries regarding ticket resales made 23    through the website;24        (5) the ticket resale marketplace operator either:25            (A) has established and maintains a consumer 26        protection rebate fund in Illinois in an amount in   HB3108- 11 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1        excess of $100,000, which must be cash available for 2        immediate disbursement for satisfaction of valid 3        consumer complaints; or4            (B) has obtained and maintains in force an errors 5        and omissions policy of insurance in the minimum 6        amount of $100,000 for the satisfaction of valid 7        consumer complaints;8        (6) the ticket resale marketplace operator has adopted 9    an independent and disinterested dispute resolution 10    procedure that allows resellers or purchasers to file 11    complaints against the other and have those complaints 12    mediated or resolved by a third party, and requires the 13    resellers or purchasers to submit to the jurisdiction of 14    the State of Illinois for complaints involving a ticketed 15    event held in Illinois;16        (7) the ticket resale marketplace operator either:17            (A) complies with all applicable requirements of 18        the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and collects and 19        remits all applicable federal, State, and local taxes; 20        or21            (B) publishes a written notice on the website 22        after the sale of one or more tickets that 23        automatically informs the ticket reseller of the 24        ticket reseller's potential legal obligation to pay 25        any applicable local amusement tax in connection with 26        the reseller's sale of tickets, and discloses to law   HB3108- 12 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1        enforcement or other government tax officials, without 2        subpoena, the name, city, state, telephone number, 3        e-mail address, user ID history, fraud complaints, and 4        bidding and listing history of any specifically 5        identified reseller or purchaser upon the receipt of a 6        verified request from law enforcement or other 7        government tax officials relating to a criminal 8        investigation or alleged illegal activity; and 9        (8) the ticket resale marketplace operator guarantees 10    to all purchasers that it will provide and in fact 11    provides a full refund of the amount paid by the purchaser 12    (including, but not limited to, all fees, regardless of 13    how characterized) if any of the following occurs:14            (A) the ticketed event is cancelled and the 15        purchaser returns the tickets to the website ticket 16        resale marketplace operator; however, reasonable 17        delivery fees need not be refunded if the previously 18        disclosed guarantee specifies that the fees will not 19        be refunded if the event is cancelled;20            (B) the ticket received by the purchaser does not 21        allow the purchaser to enter the ticketed event for 22        reasons that may include, without limitation, that the 23        ticket is counterfeit or that the ticket has been 24        cancelled by the issuer due to non-payment, unless the 25        ticket is cancelled due to an act or omission by the 26        purchaser;  HB3108- 13 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1            (C) the ticket fails to conform to its description 2        on the website; or3            (D) the ticket seller willfully fails to send the 4        ticket or tickets to the purchaser, or the ticket 5        seller attempted to deliver the ticket or tickets to 6        the purchaser in the manner required by the website 7        ticket resale marketplace operator and the purchaser 8        failed to receive the ticket or tickets. 9    Nothing in this subsection (e) shall be deemed to imply 10any limitation on ticket sales made in accordance with 11subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this Section or any 12limitation on sales made in accordance with Section 4. 13    (f) The provisions of subsections (b), (c), (d), and (e) 14of this Section apply only to the resale of a ticket after the 15initial sale of that ticket. No reseller of a ticket may refuse 16to sell tickets to another ticket reseller solely on the basis 17that the purchaser is a ticket reseller or ticket broker 18authorized to resell tickets pursuant to this Act. 19    (f-5) In addition to the requirements imposed under 20subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this Section, 21ticket brokers and resellers must comply with the requirements 22of this subsection. Before accepting any payment from a 23purchaser, a ticket broker or reseller must disclose to the 24purchaser in a clear, conspicuous, and readily noticeable 25manner the following information: 26        (1) the registered name and city of the event venue;  HB3108- 14 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1        (2) that the ticket broker or reseller is not the 2    event venue box office or its licensed ticket agent, but 3    is, instead, a ticket broker or reseller and that lost or 4    stolen tickets may be reissued only by ticket brokers or 5    resellers;6        (3) whether it is registered under this Act; and7        (4) its refund policy, name, and contact information. 8    Before selling and accepting payment for a ticket, a 9ticket broker or reseller must require the purchaser to 10acknowledge by an affirmative act the disclosures required 11under this subsection. The disclosures required by this 12subsection must be made in a clear and conspicuous manner, 13appear together, and be preceded by the heading "IMPORTANT 14NOTICE" which must be in bold face font that is larger than the 15font size of the required disclosures.16    Ticket brokers and resellers must guarantee a full refund 17of the amount paid by the purchaser, including handling and 18delivery fees, if any of the following occurs:19        (1) the ticket received by the purchaser does not 20    grant the purchaser admission to the event described on 21    the ticket, unless it is due to an act or omission by the 22    purchaser;23        (2) the ticket fails to conform substantially to its 24    description as advertised; or25        (3) the event for which the ticket has been resold is 26    cancelled and not rescheduled.   HB3108- 15 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1    This subsection (f-5) does not apply to an Internet 2auction listing service.3    (g) The provisions of Public Act 89-406 are severable 4under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.5    (h) The provisions of this amendatory Act of the 94th 6General Assembly are severable under Section 1.31 of the 7Statute on Statutes. 8(Source: P.A. 99-431, eff. 1-1-16; 100-534, eff. 9-22-17.) 9    (815 ILCS 414/1.6 new)10    Sec. 1.6. Consumer protections for ticket sales.11    (a) A ticket seller or ticket reseller shall display the 12full price of a ticket, including all assessed fees, to a 13consumer when the price of a ticket is first shown to the 14consumer and shall not increase that price during the 15transaction with the consumer, except that physical delivery 16costs and any taxes imposed by this State or a unit of local 17government shall be added to the total price of a ticket when 18the consumer provides an address to the ticket seller or 19ticket reseller.20    (b) A ticket reseller shall not sell or offer to sell a 21ticket that the ticket reseller does not possess or have a 22contract to purchase. This subsection does not apply to a 23ticket procurement service that makes a clear and conspicuous 24disclosure to the consumer concerning the nature of the 25service being provided to the consumer.  HB3108- 16 -LRB104 07731 SPS 17776 b1    (c) A ticket resale marketplace shall not include the name 2of an artist, team, or event venue in a URL of a website 3operated by the ticket resale marketplace or its agents unless 4authorized by the artist, team, or event venue.5    (d) A ticket issuer shall deliver a ticket purchased 6directly from the ticket issuer within 4 days after purchase 7unless otherwise clearly and conspicuously disclosed to the 8purchaser at the time of sale.9    (e) A ticket issuer shall disclose the number of tickets 10for an event that are withheld from sale any time it offers 11tickets for that event for sale.